District of Columbia statutes.
4-122

Visitation of wards.

A ward placed outside the District of Columbia and the States of Virginia and Maryland shall be visited not less than once a year by a voluntary agent or correspondent of the Board of Public Welfare.

History

Mar. 2, 1927, 44 Stat. 1323, ch. 271

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-123.
1973 Ed., § 3-124.

References in Text

Board of Public Welfare abolished: See note to § 4-102.